Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.44.090

Dividends.

At any time after the expiration of the date fixed for the presentation of claims, the director, subject to the approval of the court, may declare one or more dividends out of the funds remaining in his or her hands after the payment of expenses.

[ 1994 c 92 s 115; 1955 c 33 s 30.44.090. Prior: 1917 c 80 s 66; 1915 c 98 s 7; RRS s 3273. Formerly RCW 30.44.090.]